Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.0091

Eligibility exists prior to January 1, 2010.

An employee determined eligible for benefits prior to January 1, 2010, shall not have his or her eligibility terminated pursuant to the criteria established under chapter 537, Laws of 2009 unless the termination is the result of: (1) A voluntary reduction in work hours; or (2) the employee's employment with an agency other than the agency by which he or she was determined eligible prior to January 1, 2010.

[ 2009 c 537 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 537: See note following RCW 41.05.008.